Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1471XS (5) 91 lh/ko S.F. 528 Section 1. Section 249A.30A, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 249A.30A Medical assistance ââ personal needs allowance. 3 1. The personal needs allowance under the medical 4 assistance program, which may be retained by a person who is a 5 resident of a nursing facility, an intermediate care facility 6 for persons with an intellectual disability, or an intermediate 7 care facility for persons with mental illness, as defined in 8 section 135C.1 , or a person who is a resident of a psychiatric 9 medical institution for children as defined in section 135H.1 , 10 shall be fifty eighty-five dollars per month. 11 2. A resident who has income of less than fifty eighty-five 12 dollars per month shall receive a supplement from the state 13 in the amount necessary to receive a personal needs allowance 14 of fifty eighty-five dollars per month. The general assembly 15 shall annually appropriate a sufficient amount from the 16 general fund of the state to the department of health and 17 human services for this purpose to provide the supplementation 18 specified under this section . 19